Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1103.
do enact as follows:AB1103,14Section 1. 118.21 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1103,1,55118.21 (title) Teacher contracts; minimum salaries.AB1103,21Section 2. 118.21 (5) of the statutes is created to read:AB1103,2,42118.21 (5) (a) In this subsection, “annual legislator salary” means the annual 3salary of a state senator or representative to the assembly established under s. 420.923 (2) (b), whichever is greater, for a particular fiscal year.AB1103,2,75(b) A school board shall pay to a full-time teacher an annual salary that is not 6less than the annual legislator salary for the school year for which the teacher’s 7salary is paid.AB1103,2,108(c) A school board shall pay to a full-time teacher who has worked as a teacher 9for at least 10 school years an annual salary that is not less than an amount 10calculated as follows:AB1103,2,12111. Determine the annual legislator salary for the school year for which the 12teacher’s salary is paid.AB1103,2,13132. Add $15,000 to the amount determined under subd. 1.AB1103,2,1514(d) A school board shall pay to a full-time teacher who has worked as a teacher 15for at least 20 school years an annual salary that is not less than $100,000.AB1103,2,1816(e) The requirements under this subsection are not subject to collective 17bargaining under s. 111.70. The requirement under s. 118.245 does not apply to a 18school board that increases teacher wages to comply with this subsection.AB1103,319Section 3. 119.40 (3) of the statutes is created to read:AB1103,2,2220119.40 (3) (a) In this subsection, “annual legislator salary” means the annual 21salary of a state senator or representative to the assembly established under s. 2220.923 (2) (b), whichever is greater, for a particular fiscal year.AB1103,3,223(b) The board shall pay to a full-time teacher an annual salary that is not less 1than the annual legislator salary for the school year for which the teacher’s salary is 2paid.AB1103,3,53(c) The board shall pay to a full-time teacher who has worked as a teacher for 4at least 10 school years an annual salary that is not less than an amount calculated 5as follows:AB1103,3,761. Determine the annual legislator salary for the school year for which the 7teacher’s salary is paid.AB1103,3,882. Add $15,000 to the amount determined under subd. 1.AB1103,3,109(d) The board shall pay to a full-time teacher who has worked as a teacher for 10at least 20 school years an annual salary that is not less than $100,000.AB1103,3,1311(e) The requirements under this subsection are not subject to collective 12bargaining under s. 111.70. The requirement under s. 118.245 does not apply if the 13school board increases teacher wages to comply with this subsection.AB1103,414Section 4. Initial applicability.AB1103,3,1815(1) This act first applies to a teacher who is affected by a collective bargaining 16agreement or other contract that contains provisions inconsistent with this act on 17the day on which the collective bargaining agreement or contract expires or is 18extended, modified, or renewed, whichever occurs first.AB1103,3,1919